Washington statutes.
RCW 38.08.070

Personal staff for governor.

Whenever the governor shall desire the attendance of a personal staff upon any occasion, he or she shall detail therefor officers from the active list of the organized militia of Washington; the officers detailed shall attend in uniform and shall constitute the personal staff of the governor for that occasion, reverting upon completion of such duty to their regular assignments.

[ 1989 c 19 s 9; 1943 c 130 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-15. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 6; 1909 c 134 s 14. Cf. 1895 c 108 s 13, part.]